Utah statutes.
48-3a-910.   Termination of registration.

(1)  The division may terminate the registration of a registered foreign limited liability company in the manner provided in Subsections (2) and (3) if the foreign limited liability company does not:

(a)  pay, not later than 60 days after the due date, any fee, tax, interest, or penalty required to be paid to the division under this chapter or law other than this chapter;

(b)  deliver to the division for filing, not later than 60 days after the due date, an annual report required under Section 48-3a-212;

(c)  have a registered agent as required by Section 48-3a-111; or

(d)  deliver to the division for filing a statement of a change under Section 16-17-206 not later than 30 days after a change has occurred in the name or address of the registered agent.

(2)  The division may terminate the registration of a registered foreign limited liability company by:

(a)  filing a notice of termination or noting the termination in the records of the division; and

(b)  delivering a copy of the notice or the information in the notation to the foreign limited liability company's registered agent, or if the foreign limited liability company does not have a registered agent, to the foreign limited liability company's principal office.

(3)  A notice must state or the information in the notation must include:

(a)  the effective date of the termination, which must be at least 60 days after the date the division delivers the copy; and

(b)  the grounds for termination under Subsection (1).

(4)  The authority of a registered foreign limited liability company to do business in this state ceases on the effective date of the notice of termination or notation under Subsection (2), unless before that date the foreign limited liability company cures each ground for termination stated in the notice or notation.  If the foreign limited liability company cures each ground, the division shall file a record so stating.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

